Missouri, session 2026, HB3183.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 620.4100, to read as follows:
620.4100. 1. There is hereby established in the department of economic
development the "Missouri Ireland Trade Commission", which shall be composed of the
following nine members:
(1) Three members of the senate, appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate, who shall have knowledge of, or current or past involvement in, organizations
that promote Irish affairs, or have interest in the well-being of trade relations between
this state and Ireland;
(2) Three members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives, who have knowledge of, or current or past involvement in,
organizations that promote Irish affairs, or have interest in the well-being of trade
relations between this state and Ireland; and
(3) Three members appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of
the senate, who shall include the following:
(a) One member who represents a public institution of higher education in this
state;
(b) One member who represents a statewide organization that advances business
interests in this state; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3183 2
(c) One member who represents Irish-American communities or interest in this
state.
2. The commission shall study potential means of advancing the following:
(1) Bilateral trade and investment between this state and Ireland;
(2) Policy issues of mutual interest to this state and Ireland;
(3) Business and academic exchanges between this state and Ireland;
(4) Mutual economic support between this state and Ireland;
(5) Mutual investment in the infrastructure of this state and Ireland; and
(6) Any other issues as determined by the commission.
3. Members of the commission shall be appointed not later than ninety days
after the effective date of this section. Members of the commission appointed from the
general assembly shall serve terms of two years or for the remainder of the member's
term, whichever is less. Members of the commission appointed by the governor shall
serve terms of four years. Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment.
4. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but may be
reimbursed for expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties, within the
limits of funds available to the commission for such purposes.
5. The commission shall meet and hold hearings at the places it designates
throughout the state. The commission shall elect a chairperson from among the
members of the commission. The chairperson may appoint from the commission
members of subcommittees and subcommittee chairpersons at the chairperson's
discretion. A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of the business of the commission.
6. Not later than fifteen months after the effective date of this section, and
annually thereafter, the commission shall issue a report of its activities during the
preceding year and any associated findings and recommendations to the governor, the
president pro tempore of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives.
7. The commission may raise funds through direct solicitation or other
fundraising events alone, or with other groups, and accept gifts, grants, and bequests
from individuals, corporations, foundations, governmental agencies, and public and
private organizations and institutions. The funds, gifts, grants, or bequests received
pursuant to this section shall be deposited to the "Missouri Ireland Trade Commission
Fund", which is hereby created in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert

HB 3183 3
to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
on such investments shall be credited to the fund. The commission shall use the fund to
defray the commission's administrative expenses and to carry out its purposes as
provided in this section.
✔